public/spellcheck/he_TORANIT.dic
אבנוני/d
אגניו/c
אוהבינו/c
אומניפוטנטיותו/c
אוצו/e
אורטוריותיה/c
אוששיהו/d
אחדהו/d
אחזי/e
אחרונתנו/c
אטומנה/d
איילתנו/c
אייני/e
אינטרפרטציותיה/c
אלגוריותיכן/c
אלחשי/e
אלפום/d
אמודאותו/c
אמנוהו/d
אנוסנה/d
אנושיותכם/c
אסטרטגיכם/c
אסלמי/e
אפליותיהן/c
אפפים/d
אקולוגיהן/c
ארגי/e
ארכיונאותה/c
אשפזיהו/d
אששי/e
אששים/d
אתנחתותיי/c
בדקין/d
בהקי/e
בוטחותיהם/c
בזבזים/d
בזזך/c
בזריה/d
בחרי/e
בטאין/d
ביטולן/c
ביימנה/d
ביישי/e
בלוגיהם/c
בלפו/e
בנינה/d
בעליה/c
בעליהו/d
בצבצי/e
בצעיני/d
בקרון/d
ברייתן/c
ברכוה/d
בשמו/e
בתרוהו/d
גבביני/d
גבלי/e
גבשושיותיה/c
גדעיה/d
גהצו/e
גומלנו/c
גונני/e
גזלין/d
גיבוריכן/c
גייריני/d
גירוסקופיי/c
גלחי/e
גמדותך/c
גמדיני/d
גמעי/e
גפפי/e
גרדוני/d
גרונם/c
גרעני/e
גשרנה/d
דבקיכן/c
דבררי/e
דווחי/e
דוחיכם/c
דונום/d
דחקין/d
דיאלוגינו/c
דייקי/e
דיסהרמונייתך/c
דלינה/d
דלפי/e
דמיונה/c
דפדפי/e
דפנהו/d
דרבניני/d
דרורייך/c
דשדשי/e
דשנוני/d
האהיביה/d
האחידי/e
האפילי/e
האפלנה/d
האשמנה/d
הבדלת/c
הבהבי/e
הבו/d
הביאי/e
הבינינו/d
הבליחי/e
הבליעין/d
הבקיעיהו/d
הבריזי/e
הבריקיני/d
הגבירינו/d
הג'דייפי/e
הגדלותיכן/c
הגחכנה/d
הגיהי/e
הגמישי/e
הגמישין/d
הגשימיהו/d
הדאיבי/e
הדבר/d
הדהימי/e
הדהיריה/d
הדיך/c
הדיריני/d
הדמימי/e
הדפיסיה/d
הוגיעי/e
הוגיעינו/d
הוכיחיני/d
הוליכי/e
הוסטלנו/c
הועלנה/d
הורידי/e
הורין/d
הותיריה/d
הזדווגי/e
הזדנגפי/e
הזדרזי/e
הזהבותינו/c
הזהירים/d
הזיעי/e
הזליפיה/d
הזניקי/e
הזניקים/d
הזרימיהו/d
הזריקי/e
החדיריהו/d
החטיאינו/d
החילי/e
החלטנה/d
החלימי/e
החלקותיכן/c
החלשנה/d
החניפי/e
החרד/d
החרימי/e
החרם/d
החתימינו/d
הטביעי/e
הטיליה/d
הטמיעי/e
הטמיעיה/d
הטרידיה/d
היאגרו/e
היאורויותיי/c
היאותו/e
היאטמו/e
היאמרי/e
היאנקנה/d
היארזי/e
היבזזי/e
היבעינה/d
היבעלו/e
היגוזו/e
היגמרו/e
היגרבנה/d
היגרפו/e
הידחסי/e
הידמותן/c
הידרכו/e
הידרשנה/d
היוודעו/e
היוותרו/e
היזנחי/e
היזקפנה/d
היחבלי/e
היחלמי/e
היחנקי/e
היחסמנה/d
היחקקי/e
היחרתי/e
היטבלי/e
היטווי/d
היטעמו/e
היטעמויותיהן/c
היכבשו/e
היכמרי/e
היכמרנה/d
היכרתי/e
הילחצי/e
הילמדנה/d
הימדדי/e
הימחצי/e
הימסכי/e
הימעכנה/d
הימשחו/e
הינגעו/e
הינומותיו/c
הינטלו/e
הינעצנה/d
הינקטי/e
הינתנו/e
היסחפו/e
היספו/d
היספחו/e
היעברו/e
היעלבי/e
היעקדי/e
היעקפנה/d
היעקרותן/c
היעשקי/e
היפלאי/e
היפערנה/d
היפקחי/e
היפרשי/e
היצמדי/e
היקבצי/e
היקבצנה/d
היקלטי/e
היקרשי/e
היקרשנה/d
הירטבותך/c
הירטטי/e
הירקבי/e
הישאגנה/d
הישאלי/e
הישחטי/e
הישללו/e
הישמרנה/d
הישנקו/e
הישרכי/e
היתלשי/e
היתקפי/e
היתרמנה/d
הכחישיה/d
הכחישכן/c
הכישיה/d
הכליבי/e
הכלמנה/d
הכעיסיני/d
הכריחיהו/d
הכשירי/e
הכשירינו/d
הלאיה/d
הלהיביהו/d
הלחיצים/d
הלחמותינו/c
הלעיגי/e
הלעיטיה/d
המטירינו/d
המליכינו/d
המסי/e
המרא/d
המריצני/c
המשכנה/d
הנהיגים/d
הניאי/e
הניחיני/d
הנמכנה/d
הנציחיני/d
הסבי/e
הסברם/c
הסגירין/d
הסיטיה/d
הסמיכי/e
הסמיכיה/d
הספידיה/d
הסתגפי/e
הסתיימויותיו/c
הסתכסכי/e
הסתפחי/e
הסתרנה/d
העיקי/e
העליבים/d
העמקותיהן/c
העפנה/d
העריבי/e
העתר/d
הפילי/e
הפלג/d
הפסדיי/c
הפעמנה/d
הפציעי/e
הפריכין/d
הפשילי/e
הצדיקיה/d
הצטוותויותייך/c
הצטיידי/e
הצטעצעי/e
הציגיני/d
הצליבי/e
הצנחנה/d
הצרחתך/c
הקבילי/e
הקדישיה/d
הקישיהו/d
הקליקי/e
הקציבים/d
הקרישי/e
הקשותינו/c
הקשיהו/d
הרגש/d
הרטיבי/e
הריחיה/d
הרעיליהו/d
הרעיפי/e
הרעישני/c
הרשענה/d
השבירי/e
השג/d
השיאים/d
השימך/c
השיקי/e
השכימים/d
השמיטין/d
השמיצי/e
השקיטים/d
השתברי/e
השתבשותך/c
השתוקקנה/d
השתחצני/e
השתלבי/e
השתפדי/e
השתפכויותיהן/c
השתקללנה/d
השתרשי/e
התאזרי/e
התאמתויותיו/c
התאפייני/e
התבדי/d
התבדלי/e
התבלטי/e
התבשרויותיו/c
התגבשי/e
התגמשי/e
התדלדלנה/d
התהלכי/e
התחבטויותייך/c
התחוררי/e
התחנכי/e
התחסלנה/d
התחרשי/e
התיזם/c
התייזעי/e
התייראי/e
התכבסנה/d
התכופפי/e
התכתשויותיהן/c
התלהטי/e
התלקקי/e
התמיהין/d
התמירי/e
התמקחותנו/c
התמקצעי/e
התנדפי/e
התניעי/e
התנכלנה/d
התנצרותם/c
התנקשי/e
התעטפי/e
התעני/d
התענייני/e
התעקשותכן/c
התערסלי/e
התפטמי/e
התפנינה/d
התפנצ'רי/e
התפרסמויותיה/c
התפרפרי/e
התקהלי/e
התקעקעי/e
התקפנה/d
התקשחותו/c
התראייני/e
התרוששי/e
התרפאי/e
התרתחנה/d
ודאותן/c
זגזוגיהם/c
זווגיני/d
זייני/e
זייפניה/c
זנותה/c
זפתים/d
חבבי/e
חבורנה/d
חביביכן/c
חוגרותיך/c
חוויהו/d
חוקיה/c
חטיבותיה/c
חימושן/c
חלוקיי/c
חלחלי/e
חלחלנה/d
חמישיותיה/c
חמשון/d
חספסי/e
חפותה/c
חפשון/d
חריגינו/c
חרפיה/d
חשקיו/c
חתרי/e
טבעהו/d
טומנותיו/c
טינופתכן/c
טלטלי/e
טמניהו/d
טנקן/c
טרמפולינותיו/c
יבשוה/d
יבשן/e
יודעותיהן/c
ייזוען/c
יירשיה/d
ימיית/c
יצאני/d
ירודי/c
ירטן/d
כביני/d
כבשותיי/c
כורמותיכם/c
כייפי/e
כיפוריו/c
כלכלין/d
כנסנו/c
כערים/d
כרטיסיותינו/c
כתשי/e
לבושיהן/c
לדיה/d
לוטוסנו/c
לחששי/e
לטפים/d
ליברליי/c
לפתו/c
לקקינו/d
מאורותיכם/c
מאפרתכן/c
מבזהו/c
מבצרך/c
מגדלותיך/c
מגרדתני/c
מדידתך/c
מדרי/e
מדרסיי/c
מודעותייך/c
מונגוליה/c
מוציאיכן/c
מושכתני/c
מזלפיהם/c
מחבקיכן/c
מחילתי/c
מחסלותינו/c
מחצינו/d
מטאוריטי/c
מטעימיכם/c
מייגעותיכם/c
מינותו/c
מכבידייך/c
מכללת/c
מכתיביה/c
מלחמותיה/c
ממוטטותיו/c
ממצאיהם/c
ממשים/d
מנווטו/c
מנעולי/c
מסבירם/c
מסטלי/e
מסיכתן/c
מספיגותיהן/c
מעודדותיך/c
מענגותיכן/c
מעשבתו/c
מפלותיי/c
מפריעתכם/c
מצוינויותיכם/c
מצון/d
מצמיתי/c
מקהילותיכן/c
מקלן/c
מקרישת/c
מרזבה/c
מרטין/d
מרמלדותיכן/c
מרשעותיי/c
משובעיכן/c
משיאתו/c
משלהבתן/c
משענותיך/c
משרתה/c
מששי/e
מתוותני/c
מתמחתכן/c
מתרבתיי/c
נבענה/d
נגינתכם/c
נהמי/e
נווטיהם/c
נוענה/d
נורמליזצייתן/c
נטלי/c
נטשי/e
ניעורכם/c
נמי/c
נמקיני/d
נפחיהו/d
נפטון/c
נקבוהו/d
נרגילתה/c
נרמלי/e
נשופנה/d
סבבנו/c
סבכום/d
סובלנותי/c
סווגי/e
סופרותינו/c
סחטין/d
סיבולתי/c
סילונך/c
סירנתן/c
סכנים/d
סלפו/e
סמנוהו/d
סמרטוטיותכן/c
ספירלתי/c
ספררי/e
סרבנה/d
סריגיהם/c
עדינותכן/c
עדנונו/d
עוצי/e
עוצרינו/c
עיטושיה/c
עכבוהו/d
עכוזינו/c
עמעמי/e
ענובנה/d
עניית/c
עקירתנו/c
עקמום/d
ערבבי/e
ערפדי/c
עשביני/d
פגרתן/c
פהקו/e
פוסלתכן/c
פזרהו/d
פטישוניכם/c
פטפטי/e
פילוחם/c
פישולם/c
פלפלנה/d
פמפלטם/c
פסנתרניותיך/c
פספסי/e
פצחון/d
פקעתם/c
פרזוליי/c
פרזלי/e
פרטום/d
פרעושיכן/c
פשטיני/d
פתך/c
צדדו/e
צדוקנה/d
צוותיך/c
ציכם/c
צלעותיו/c
צלקי/e
צמרריה/d
צעירן/c
צרבי/e
קבילותיהם/c
קבצהו/d
קובלנותיהם/c
קומתיי/c
קורכן/c
קזזנה/d
קטבי/e
קיוסקיי/c
קלגסיתן/c
קלטריה/d
קמיצתן/c
קנינה/d
קננה/e
קצובותיך/c
קריירותיה/c
ראיהו/d
ראייני/e
רדיאטורכם/c
רוששים/d
רחצי/e
ריבודה/c
רמיה/d
רעלותיכם/c
רפדהו/d
רצדי/e
רתקינו/d
שאפי/e
שבויך/c
שבצנה/d
שדרום/d
שוחו/e
שומעותיה/c
שחטים/d
שיופך/c
שכבי/e
שכנעיה/d
שלגה/c
שלקיה/d
שממו/e
שננוהו/d
שערותינו/c
שפדוהו/d
שפעלי/e
שקודנה/d
שרוקנה/d
שררי/e
שתיליהם/c
תבלים/d
תוספותיהם/c
תחחי/e
תיווכו/c
תמרוצייך/c
תנונו/d
תפחי/e
תקבוליהם/c
תקצביה/d
